src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON THMINV_W_LOC !dub or prt dub
+1:aan   THMINV_W_LOC_PCP_SET  ; !aanenh, aambanenh   
+1Pl:aang  THMINV_W_LOC_PCP_SET  ; !aangenh, aangibanenh
+21Pl:angw4 THMINV_W_LOC_PCP_SET  ; !angwenh, angobanenh 
+2Pl:egw4  THMINV_W_LOC_PCP_SET  ; !egwenh, egobanenh   
+2:an    THMINV_W_LOC_PCP_SET  ; !anenh, ambanenh     

LEXICON THMINV_Y_LOC !end or prt
!+1:aan2     THMINV_Y_LOC_SPECIAL_PCP ; !Medler
!+1+Prt:aambaan2i1 THMINV_Y_LOC_SPECIAL_PCP ; !Medler
+1:aany1     THMINV_Y_LOC_SPECIAL_PCP ; !0 v 1sg
+1+Prt:aambaany1 THMINV_Y_LOC_SPECIAL_2_PCP ; !0 v 1sg
+1Pl:aang     THMINV_Y_LOC_PCP_SET ; !i epenthesis
+21Pl:ang      THMINV_Y_LOC_PCP_SET ; !i epenthesis
+2Pl:egw4     THMINV_Y_LOC_PCP_SET ; !w4 -> o
+2:an       THMINV_Y_LOC_PCP_SET ; !n->m _ b

LEXICON THMINV_Y_LOC_SPECIAL_PCP
    # ;
    VTA_CNJ_PCP_INAN_PL ; 

LEXICON THMINV_Y_LOC_SPECIAL_2_PCP
        # ;
0:i1    VTA_CNJ_PCP_INAN_PL ; 

LEXICON THMINV_NEG_SIIW_LOC !dub or prt dub
+1:aan    THMINV_W_LOC_PCP_SET   ; !0 v 1sg  !cons best guess
+1Pl:aang   THMINV_W_LOC_PCP_SET ; !0 v 1pl    !cons best guess
+21Pl:ang    THMINV_W_LOC_PCP_SET ; !0 v 21pl     !cons best guess
+2Pl:egw4   THMINV_NEG_SIIW_OPT_3      ; !3sg v 2pl !cons best guess, could be isinoowegwenh, though 3sg isn't general with isinoo
+2:an     THMINV_W_LOC_PCP_SET    ; !0 v 2sg !cons best guess

LEXICON THMINV_NEG_SIIW_OPT_3
+3:0    THMINV_NEG_SIIW_OPT_3_PCP_SET ;
        THMINV_W_LOC_PCP_SET ;

LEXICON THMINV_NEG_SIIW_OPT_3_PCP_SET
@P.3Num.Pl@ VTA_CNJ_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ; !(hypo) verb number and pcp number only have to agree when it is 3v3, so ok for disagreement here, where it is 3sg v 2pl

LEXICON THMINV_NEG_SIW_LOC !end or prt
!+1:aan2       THMINV_Y_LOC_SPECIAL_PCP ; !Medler
+1:aany1       THMINV_Y_LOC_SPECIAL_PCP ; !Easier to just spell out variants here 
+1+Prt:aamb1an2i1    THMINV_Y_LOC_SPECIAL_PCP ; 
+1Pl:aang       THMINV_Y_LOC_PCP_SET ; ! i epen to avoid CC 
+21Pl:ang        THMINV_Y_LOC_PCP_SET ; !i epen to avoid CC 
+2Pl:eg         THMINV_NEG_SIW_OPT_3   ; ! i epen to avoid CC # ; !0 v 2pl
+2:an         THMINV_Y_LOC_PCP_SET ; ! n->m _ b1

LEXICON THMINV_NEG_SIW_OPT_3
+3:0    THMINV_NEG_SIW_OPT_3_PCP_SET ;
        THMINV_Y_LOC_PCP_SET ;

LEXICON THMINV_NEG_SIW_OPT_3_PCP_SET
@P.3Num.Pl@ VTA_CNJ_PRT_OR_END ; !(hypo) verb number and pcp number only have to agree when it is 3v3, so ok for disagreement here, where it is 3sg v 2pl

!LEXICON THMINV_NEG_SIW_LOC_SPECIAL_PCP !this was orphaned. the apparent parent sublexicon has continuations to THMINV_Y_LOC_SPECIAL_PCP, which exactly duplicates this, so commenting it out
!    # ;
!    VTA_CNJ_PCP_INAN_PL ; 

LEXICON THMINV_W_LOC_PCP_SET
@P.3Num.InanPl@ VTA_CNJ_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ; 

LEXICON THMINV_Y_LOC_PCP_SET
@P.3Num.InanPl@ VTA_CNJ_PRT_OR_END ; 

!}thminv end

!{thm1pl cont
LEXICON THM1PL_NEG
+Neg:siw            THM1PL_NEG_LOC ; !end, prt, dub, prt dub
0:y                 THM1PL_LOC_Y ; !end or prt
0:w                 THM1PL_LOC_W ; !dub or prt dub

LEXICON THM1PL_LOC_W !dub or prt dub
+2Pl:egw4  VTA_CNJ_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ;
+2:an       VTA_CNJ_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ;

LEXICON THM1PL_NEG_LOC !end, prt, dub, prt dub
    THM1PL_LOC_Y ;
    THM1PL_LOC_W ;

LEXICON THM1PL_LOC_Y !end or prt
+2Pl:egw4  VTA_CNJ_PRT_OR_END ; !yeg, yegoban
+2:an       VTA_CNJ_PRT_OR_END ; !yan, yam

!}thm1pl end

!{thm2a continuations
!{thm2a neg
LEXICON THM2A_NEG_FRAG
0:oon       THM2A_NEG_LOC_ONLY  ; !1sg v 2pl'
0:ow        THM2A_NEG_OW_21PL ; !3pl v 21pl
0:oow       THM2A_NEG_OOW_2PL ; !3pl v 21pl
0:o         THM2A_NEG_O_3B ; 

LEXICON THM2A_NEG_O_3B
!allophony is clear (fortition of d1), but not worth trouble
+3Pl:kwaa   THM2A_NEG_O_3B_MODE ; !kwaaban, kwaawenh, kwaa
+3:g         THM2A_NEG_O_3B_PCP_SET ; !giban (epen i), gwenh (w not epenthetic!), g

LEXICON THM2A_NEG_O_3B_PCP_SET
@P.3Num.Pl@ THM2A_NEG_O_3B_MODE ;

LEXICON THM2A_NEG_O_3B_MODE
            VTA_CNJ_PRT_OR_END ;
!+Dub:wen2  VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ; !Medler
+Dub:weny1  VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ; !ideally these would go through DUB_OR_PRT_DUB, but thew needs to be present for dub, and will trigger i insertion with w>b1
+Prt+Dub:%>b1an2eny1  VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ;

LEXICON THM2A_NEG_OOW_2PL
+21Pl:ang     VTA_CNJ_3B_PRE_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ;
+2Pl+3Pl:egwaa THM2A_NEG_OOW_EGWAA_PRT ; !3sg v 2pl quite irregular/confusing

LEXICON THM2A_NEG_OOW_EGWAA_PRT
                VTA_CNJ_PRT_OR_END ;
!+Dub:wen2       VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ; !Medler
+Dub:weny1       VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ; !w probably epenthetic
+Prt+Dub:%>b1an2eny1 VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ; !ideally these would go through DUB_OR_PRT_DUB, but thew needs to be present for dub, and will trigger i insertion with w>b1

LEXICON THM2A_NEG_OW_21PL
+21Pl:ang     VTA_CNJ_3B_PRE_PRT ; 

LEXICON THM2A_NEG_LOC_ONLY
+2Pl:agogw4        VTA_CNJ_PRT_OR_END ; 
+2Pl:agogw4        VTA_CNJ_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ; !duplicated till better arises
!+2:aan2            VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ; !Medler
0:aanh            VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ; !duplicated to allow pos forms to use same cont lexicon !no person specified bc thm2a is second person agr
0:aan2            THM2A_POS_LOC_AAN2_PRT ; !aanh, aambaanh, aanenh        !no person specified bc thm2a is second person agr
!} thm2a neg end

!{ thm2a pos
LEXICON THM2A_POS_LOC
+2Pl:agogw4     THM2A_POS_LOC_PRT ; !agogwenh, agog, agogoban (hyp: agogobanenh)
0:aan2       VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ; !duplicated to allow neg forms to use same cont lexicon !no person specified bc thm2a is second person agr
0:aan2       THM2A_POS_LOC_AAN2_PRT ; !aa, aambaanh, aanenh         !no person specified bc thm2a is second person agr
+2Pl:egw4       THM2A_POS_LOC_3B ; !eg, egwaaban, egoban, egwaawenh, egwenh
+21Pl:angw4      THM2A_POS_LOC_3B ;

LEXICON THM2A_POS_LOC_3B
+3Pl:waaw4   THM2A_POS_LOC_PRT ; 
+3:0        THM2A_POS_LOC_3B_PCP_SET ;

LEXICON THM2A_POS_LOC_3B_PCP_SET
@P.3Num.Pl@ THM2A_POS_LOC_PRT ; 

LEXICON THM2A_POS_LOC_AAN2_PRT
            VTA_CNJ_DUB_AND_END ;
+Prt:%>b1aan2 VTA_CNJ_DUB_AND_END ;
!+Prt:%>b1aan2 VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ; !Medler
+Prt:%>b1aany1 VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ;

LEXICON THM2A_POS_LOC_PRT
    VTA_CNJ_PRT_OR_END ;
    VTA_CNJ_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ;

!} thm2a pos end
!} thm2a continuations end
!{thmnul cont
!{actual nulls
LEXICON THMNUL_LOC
+1Pl:angi     VTA_CNJ_3C_PRE_PRT ; !i epenthetic
+2:a        VTA_CNJ_3C_PRE_PRT ; 
+1:agw4       VTA_CNJ_3B_PRE_PRT ; !w4w -> w, w4b -> o, w4 -> 0
+21Pl:ang        VTA_CNJ_3B_PRE_PRT ; !epenthetic i before b1
+2Pl:egw4       VTA_CNJ_3B_PRE_PRT ; 

!}

!{-aaw forms
!nearly identical to actual null forms, but must end in +Dub
!phon difference too! agoban (Prt, o from w4) vs agenh (Dub, *agwenh)
LEXICON THMNUL_AA_LOC
+1Pl:angi     VTA_CNJ_3C_PRE_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ; !i epenthetic
+2:a        VTA_CNJ_3C_PRE_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ; 
+1:ag        VTA_CNJ_3B_PRE_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ; 
+21Pl:angw4       VTA_CNJ_3B_PRE_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ; !w4V -> wV, w4w -> w
+2Pl:egw4      VTA_CNJ_3B_PRE_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ; 

!}
!}thmnul end

!{thmdir cont
LEXICON THMDIR_NEG
+Neg:siw    THMDIR_NEG_SIW_LOCAL ;
+Neg:siiw   THMDIR_NEG_SIIW_LOCAL ;
+Neg:sig    THMDIR_NEG_3_NO_MODE ;
+Neg:sii    THMDIR_NEG_3 ; 
            THMDIR_POS_3 ;

LEXICON THMDIR_NEG_SIW_LOCAL
+1Pl:angi           VTA_CNJ_3C_PRE_PRT ; !i epenthetic
+1:ag             VTA_CNJ_3B_PRE_PRT ;
+21Pl:ang            VTA_CNJ_3B_PRE_PRT ;
+2Pl:egw4           VTA_CNJ_3B_PRE_PRT ; !w4w -> w (egwaa, not egowaa), w4C -> o (egoban, not egiban), w4 -> 0 (eg, not egw/o)
+2:a              VTA_CNJ_3C_PRE_PRT ; 

LEXICON THMDIR_NEG_SIIW_LOCAL
+1Pl:angi       VTA_CNJ_3C_PRE_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ; !i certainly epenthetic
+2:a          VTA_CNJ_3C_PRE_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ;
+1:ag         VTA_CNJ_3B_PRE_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ;
+21Pl:ang        VTA_CNJ_3B_PRE_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ;
+2Pl:eg         VTA_CNJ_3B_PRE_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ;

!{third person negatives
!a lot of irregularity:sig, sigwaa, siiwaapan, siipan, siigwaawenh, siigwenh, hypo: siiwaagobanenh, siigobanenh
LEXICON THMDIR_NEG_3_NO_MODE
+3Pl:waa  THMDIR_NEG_3_NO_MODE_PCP_PL_SET ; !could get sigwaa with phonology (d1<w4>aa)
+3:0       THMDIR_NEG_3_NO_MODE_PCP_OBV_SET ; !ditto for sig
+3ObvPlus:nid1y1  THMDIR_NEG_3_NO_MODE_PCP_OBV_SET ; !ditto for sig

LEXICON THMDIR_NEG_3_NO_MODE_PCP_PL_SET
@P.3Num.Pl@     VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ;
@P.3Num.Obv@    VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ;

LEXICON THMDIR_NEG_3_NO_MODE_PCP_OBV_SET
@P.3Num.Obv@    VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ;

LEXICON THMDIR_NEG_3
+3Pl:waad1     THMDIR_NEG_3_PCP_PL_SET ; !notice, not dwaa, as dub would indicate
+3:d1           THMDIR_NEG_3_PCP_OBV_SET ;
+3ObvPlus:nid1y1  THMDIR_NEG_3_PCP_OBV_SET ; !ditto for sig
+3Pl:gwaaw4    THMDIR_NEG_3_PCP_DUB_PL_SET ;  !siigwaawenh looks like d1<w4>aa<w>-enh, but then you break up a morpheme, problem for prt
+3:gw4          THMDIR_NEG_3_PCP_DUB_OBV_SET ; !siigwenh looks like d1-w4enh, but problems with this analysis in pl
+3ObvPlus:nigw4  THMDIR_NEG_3_PCP_DUB_OBV_SET ; !Total guess here for what this morpheme should look like. check it if possible! 5/24/2024

LEXICON THMDIR_NEG_3_PCP_PL_SET
@P.3Num.Pl@     THMDIR_NEG_3_PRT ;
@P.3Num.Obv@    THMDIR_NEG_3_PRT ;

LEXICON THMDIR_NEG_3_PCP_OBV_SET
@P.3Num.Obv@    THMDIR_NEG_3_PRT ;

LEXICON THMDIR_NEG_3_PCP_DUB_PL_SET
@P.3Num.Pl@     VTA_CNJ_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ;
@P.3Num.Obv@    VTA_CNJ_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ;

LEXICON THMDIR_NEG_3_PCP_DUB_OBV_SET
@P.3Num.Obv@    VTA_CNJ_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ;

LEXICON THMDIR_NEG_3_PRT
+Prt:%>b1an2i1  VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ;
!}

!{ positive third persons post-aa
!much more regular than negatives:waad, d, waagwenh, gwenh, waapan, pan, waagobanenh, gobanenh
LEXICON THMDIR_POS_3
+3Pl:waad1y1          THMDIR_POS_3_PCP_PL_SET ;
+3:d1y1                THMDIR_POS_3_PCP_OBV_SET ;
+3ObvPlus:nid1y1        THMDIR_POS_3_PCP_OBV_SET ;

LEXICON THMDIR_POS_3_PCP_PL_SET
@P.3Num.Pl@     THMDIR_POS_3_MODE ;
@P.3Num.Obv@    THMDIR_POS_3_MODE ; !This does not seem immediately right, perhaps check it? 5/23/2024. I think the participles can be plural or obviative from this point. I wrote it this way elsewhere, so I doubt it is a mistake

LEXICON THMDIR_POS_3_PCP_OBV_SET
@P.3Num.Obv@    THMDIR_POS_3_MODE ;

LEXICON THMDIR_POS_3_MODE 
            VTA_CNJ_PRT_OR_END ;
!can below be shunted into DUB_OR_PRT_DUB?
!+Dub:w4en2  VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ; !Medler
!+Prt+Dub:w4b1an2en2  VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ; !Medler
+Dub:w4eny1  VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ;
+Prt+Dub:w4b1an2eny1  VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ;
!}
!}

!{thm2b cont
LEXICON THM2B_3
+3Pl:waa THM2B_3_PL_PREMODE ;
+3:0   THM2B_3_PCP_SET ;

LEXICON THM2B_3_PCP_SET
@P.3Num.Pl@ THM2B_3_SG_PREMODE ;

LEXICON THM2B_3_SG_PREMODE 
        VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ;
        THM2B_3_PRT ; 
        VTA_CNJ_DUB_AND_END ;

LEXICON THM2B_3_PL_PREMODE 
        VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ;
0:w     VTA_CNJ_DUB_AND_END ; !epenthetic? could be part of extended dub realization
        THM2B_3_PRT ;

LEXICON THM2B_3_PRT 
+Prt:%>b1an2i1  VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ;
+Prt:%>b1an2    VTA_CNJ_DUB_AND_END ;

!}

LEXICON VTA_CNJ_3C_PRE_PRT
+3Pl:dwaa   VTA_CNJ_PRT_OR_END ;
+3:d         VTA_CNJ_3C_PRE_PRT_PCP_SET ;!seems very odd that +3 and not +3Pl would pick up possibility for 3Pl Pcp !palatalizes in pcp (d1pal now targets d1 and d), but does not undergo d1%>b1 -> p

LEXICON VTA_CNJ_3C_PRE_PRT_PCP_SET
0:y1        VTA_CNJ_PCP_PL ; 
@P.3Num.Pl@ VTA_CNJ_PRT_OR_END ; 

LEXICON VTA_CNJ_3B_PRE_PRT
+3Pl:waa   VTA_CNJ_PRT_OR_END ;
+3:0        VTA_CNJ_3B_PRE_PRT_PCP_SET ; !seems very odd that +3 and not +3Pl would pick up possibility for 3Pl Pcp

LEXICON VTA_CNJ_3B_PRE_PRT_PCP_SET
@P.3Num.Pl@ VTA_CNJ_PRT_OR_END ;

LEXICON VTA_CNJ_PRT_OR_END
                VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET ;
+Prt:%>b1an2i1    VTA_CNJ_PCP_GET  ;

LEXICON VTA_CNJ_3B_PRE_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB
+3Pl:waaw4     VTA_CNJ_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ; !waawenh, waabanenh (hypo)
+3:0      VTA_CNJ_3B_PRE_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB_PCP_SET  ;!seems very odd that +3 and not +3Pl would pick up possibility for 3Pl Pcp

LEXICON VTA_CNJ_3B_PRE_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB_PCP_SET
@P.3Num.Pl@ VTA_CNJ_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ;

LEXICON VTA_CNJ_3C_PRE_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB
+3Pl:dwaaw4 VTA_CNJ_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB ; !dwaawenh, dwaabanenh (hypo)
+3:d         VTA_CNJ_3C_PRE_DUB_OR_PRT_DUB_PCP_SET ;!seems very odd that +3 and not +3Pl would pick up possibility for 3Pl Pcp
